test/src/gt-norm-yamls/verbImpers_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Impersonal verbs. Lexicon SJIERRIT_IV, BIEKKASTIT_IV, GALSSJOT_IV, BIEGGAT_IV

Tests:
  Verb - slabttsit: # SJIERRIT_IV
    slabttsit+V+IV+Inf: slabttsit
    slabttsit+V+IV+Sup: slabttsitjit
    slabttsit+V+IV+Ger: slabttsidijn
    slabttsit+V+IV+PrfPrc: slabttsim
    slabttsit+V+IV+Actio+Ess: slabttsimin
    slabttsit+V+IV+Actio+Ela: slabttsimis
    slabttsit+V+IV+VAbess: [slabttsik]
    slabttsit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: []
    slabttsit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: slabttsi
    slabttsit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: slabttsij
    slabttsit+V+IV+ImprtII+Sg3: slabttsijus
    slabttsit+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: slabttsisj
    slabttsit+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: [slabttsiduvvat]
    slabttsit+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [slabttsiduvvá]

  Verb - láhodit: # BIEKKASTIT_IV
    láhodit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Inf: láhodit
    láhodit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Sup: láhodittjat
    láhodit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ger: láhodattijn
    láhodit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+PrfPrc: láhodam
    láhodit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Actio+Ess: [láhodime, láhodimen]
    láhodit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Actio+Ela: láhodimes
    láhodit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+VAbess: láhodik
    láhodit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg2: []
    láhodit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg3: láhot
    láhodit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg3: láhodij
    láhodit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Sg3: láhodis
    láhodit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+ImprtII+Sg3: láhodus
    láhodit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Sg3: láhodisj
    láhodit+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: [láhoduvvat]
    láhodit+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [láhoduvvá]

  Verb - lievnnot: # GALSSJOT_IV
    lievnnot+V+IV+Inf: lievnnot
    lievnnot+V+IV+Sup: [lievnotjit, lievnutjit]
    lievnnot+V+IV+Ger: lievnodijn
    lievnnot+V+IV+PrfPrc: lievnnum
    lievnnot+V+IV+Actio+Ess: lievnnomin
    lievnnot+V+IV+Actio+Ela: lievnnomis
    lievnnot+V+IV+VAbess: [lievnok]
    lievnnot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: []
    lievnnot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lievnnu
    lievnnot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lievnoj
    lievnnot+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: lievnnus
    lievnnot+V+IV+ImprtII+Sg3: lievnnus
    lievnnot+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: lievnosj
    lievnnot+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: [lievnoduvvat]
    lievnnot+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [lievnoduvvá]

  Verb - hærmmot: # GALSSJOT_IV
    hærmmot+V+IV+Inf: [hærmmot, härmmot]
    hærmmot+V+IV+Sup: [hærmotjit, härmotjit, hermutjit]
    hærmmot+V+IV+Ger: [hærmodijn, härmodijn]
    hærmmot+V+IV+PrfPrc: [hærmmum, härmmum]
    hærmmot+V+IV+Actio+Ess: [hærmmomin, härmmomin]
    hærmmot+V+IV+Actio+Ela: [hærmmomis, härmmomis]
    hærmmot+V+IV+VAbess: [hærmok, härmok]
    hærmmot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: []
    hærmmot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [hærmmu, härmmu]
    hærmmot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [hærmoj, härmoj]
    hærmmot+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: [hærmmus, härmmus]
    hærmmot+V+IV+ImprtII+Sg3: [hærmmus, härmmus]
    hærmmot+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: [hærmosj, härmosj]
    hærmmot+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: [hærmoduvvat, härmoduvvat]
    hærmmot+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [hærmoduvvá, härmoduvvá]

  Verb - siebllat: # BIEGGAT_IV
    siebllat+V+IV+Inf: siebllat
    siebllat+V+IV+Sup: sieblatjit
    siebllat+V+IV+Ger: siebladijn
    siebllat+V+IV+PrfPrc: siebllam
    siebllat+V+IV+Actio+Ess: siebllamin
    siebllat+V+IV+Actio+Ela: siebllamis
    siebllat+V+IV+VAbess: [sieblak]
    siebllat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: []
    siebllat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siebllá
    siebllat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sieblaj
    siebllat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: siebllis
    siebllat+V+IV+ImprtII+Sg3: siebllus
    siebllat+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: sieblasj
    siebllat+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: [siebladuvvat]
    siebllat+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [siebladuvvá]

  Verb - dednjat: # BIEGGAT_IV
    dednjat+V+IV+Inf: dednjat
    dednjat+V+IV+Sup: denjatjit
    dednjat+V+IV+Ger: denjadijn
    dednjat+V+IV+PrfPrc: dednjam
    dednjat+V+IV+Actio+Ess: dednjamin
    dednjat+V+IV+Actio+Ela: dednjamis
    dednjat+V+IV+VAbess: [denjak]
    dednjat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: []
    dednjat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [dædnjá, dädnjá]
    dednjat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: denjaj
    dednjat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: dednjis
    dednjat+V+IV+ImprtII+Sg3: dednjus
    dednjat+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: denjasj
    dednjat+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: [denjaduvvat]
    dednjat+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [denjaduvvá]
